California statutes. Public Resources Code
A petition for redetermination of the application of this chapter shall be in writing and be sent to the department or its designee. The petition shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded and include supporting documentation. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds or provide additional documentation at any time prior to the date that the department issues its order or decision with regard to the petition for redetermination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 7.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4222.

If a petition for redetermination of the application of this chapter is filed within the 30-day period, the department shall reconsider whether the fee is due and make a determination in writing. The department may eliminate the fee based on a determination that this chapter does not apply to the person who filed the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4222.5.

If a timely petition for redetermination has been filed pursuant to Section 4220, all legal action to collect the fire prevention fee shall be stayed pending the final determination of the department pursuant to Section 4224.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4223.

Notice of the determination of the department pursuant to Section 4222 shall be served, on the same date, to the board, the State Board of Equalization, and the person who filed the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4224.

The order or decision of the department upon a petition for redetermination of the fire prevention fee shall become final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice of the determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4225.

(a) (1) The fire prevention fee determined to be due by the department pursuant to this article is due and payable at the time it becomes final, and if it is not paid when due and payable, notwithstanding the penalty imposed pursuant to Section
 55042 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a penalty of 20 percent of the fee determined to be due shall be added to the amount due and payable for each 30-day period in which the fee remains unpaid.

(2) On and after January 1, 2015, the penalty imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be imposed or added to any fee that remains unpaid or any fee that is not paid when due and payable.

(b) On and after January 1, 2015, the fire prevention fee determined to be due by the department pursuant to this article is due and payable at the time it becomes final, and if it is not paid when due and
 payable, the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 55086 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 8.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4226.

Written notice required by this article shall be served as follows:

(a) The notice shall be placed in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the petitioner at his or her address as it appears in the records of the department. The giving of notice shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States Post Office, or a mailbox, subpost office, substation, mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service without extension of time for any reason.

(b) In lieu of mailing, a notice may be served personally by delivering it to the person to be served and service shall be
 deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4227.

A dispute regarding the fire prevention fee imposed by this chapter shall be resolved pursuant to this article only.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4228.

If the department determines that a person is entitled to a refund of all or part of the fire prevention fee paid pursuant to this chapter, the person shall make a claim to the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 55221) of Part 30 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Repeal [4229. - 4229.]

4229.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted on or before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 135, Sec. 15.   (AB 398)   Effective July 25, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 1.5, commencing with Section 4210.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hazardous Fire Areas [4251. - 4290.5.]

4251.

As used in this chapter:

“Hazardous fire area” means any area which is designated as a hazardous fire area by the board or the director pursuant to Section 4252 or 4253.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4252.

Upon the written petition of the owners or authorized agents of more than 50 percent of the land, including public land, within the exterior boundaries of any area of not less than 10,000 acres in size, upon which a fire hazard exists due to the presence of flammable material or cover, the board may designate such area as a hazardous fire area, and shall declare the period of time during which the area shall be so designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4253.

When the director determines that a fire hazard exists in any other area due to the presence of flammable material or cover, the director may by regulation designate the area to be a hazardous fire area. The regulation shall declare the period of time during which the area shall be designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 65.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4254.

Notice of the designation of each hazardous fire area designated pursuant to Section 4252 shall be given by the posting of notices at intervals of not greater than one mile along the exterior boundaries of the area or along roads and trails passing through the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1073, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4255.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a person shall not smoke or build a campfire or other open fire within a hazardous fire area.

(b) The board may designate by regulation campgrounds or campsites within hazardous fire areas where smoking and the building of campfires are allowed. However, no campground or campsite shall be designated without the consent of the owner, or the owner’s authorized agent, of the land upon which it is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 66.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4256.

When it is necessary in the interest of public peace or safety, the director, with the consent of the owner of any lands designated as a hazardous fire area, may declare those lands closed to entry by any person. Any public highway traversing
 the hazardous fire area, shall, however, be excluded from the order of closure, and the closure to entry does not prohibit or curtail the entry or use of the lands by the owner of the lands or the owner’s agent, nor the entry by a federal, state or county officer upon the closed area in the performance of their official duties. All state and county law enforcement officers shall enforce
 the order of closure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 67.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4257.

Any order which is issued pursuant to Section 4256 shall be published twice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in any county that is affected by the order. The publication shall be separated by a period of not less than one week and not more than two weeks. The order shall also be posted in such public places in each county as the director may direct, and along roads and trails which pass through the areas declared to be closed to camping or entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4258.

Whenever the director determines that a fire hazard exists in any area within a state responsibility area due to the presence of flammable material or cover, the director, by regulation, may designate that area as a hazardous fire area for the purpose of prohibiting the use or possession of fireworks therein. The hazardous fire area shall include only those areas that are critical and hazardous due to the threat of wildfire to life, property, and natural resources posed by the fireworks. The hazardous fire area shall not include areas that are the responsibility of a county which is contracting for fire protection to the director.

The regulation may designate areas where specified types of fireworks, not otherwise prohibited, are allowed for industrial, commercial, or agricultural use, for ceremonies, or for emergency signaling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1073, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4259.

(a) The use or possession of fireworks is prohibited within any hazardous fire area designated pursuant to Section 4252 or 4258. However, the use of fireworks within any hazardous fire area may be allowed, if the use is determined by the director not to present a fire hazard.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), fireworks may be possessed in a vehicle on any public highway traversing a hazardous fire area when not otherwise prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1073, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4260.

No regulation adopted pursuant to this article shall prohibit or curtail the complete possession and use of any area by the owner of the area or the owner’s agent, except that the use or possession of fireworks shall not be allowed in a hazardous fire area designated pursuant to Section 4258, other than as designated for their use or possession pursuant to that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1073, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

4290.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations implementing minimum fire safety standards related to defensible space that are applicable to state responsibility area lands under the authority of the department, and to lands classified and designated as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 51177 of the Government Code. These regulations apply to the perimeters and access to all residential, commercial, and industrial building construction within state responsibility areas approved after January 1, 1991, and within lands classified and designated as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 51177 of the Government Code after July 1, 2021. The board may not adopt building standards, as defined in Section 18909 of the Health
 and Safety Code, under the authority of this section. As an integral part of fire safety standards, the State Fire Marshal has the authority to adopt regulations for roof coverings and openings into the attic areas of buildings specified in Section 13108.5 of the Health and Safety Code. The regulations apply to the placement of mobile homes as defined by National Fire Protection Association standards. These regulations do not apply where an application for a building permit was filed prior to January 1, 1991, or to parcel or tentative maps or other developments approved prior to January 1, 1991, if the final map for the tentative map is approved within the time prescribed by the local ordinance. The regulations shall include all of the following:

(1) Road standards for fire equipment access.

(2) Standards for signs identifying streets, roads, and buildings.

(3) Minimum private water supply reserves for emergency fire use.

(4) Fuel breaks and greenbelts.

(b) The board shall, on and after July 1, 2021, periodically update regulations for fuel breaks and greenbelts near communities to provide greater fire safety for the perimeters to all residential, commercial, and industrial building construction within state responsibility areas and lands classified and designated as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 51177 of the Government Code, after July 1, 2021. These regulations shall include measures to preserve undeveloped ridgelines to reduce fire risk and improve fire protection. The board shall, by regulation, define “ridgeline” for purposes of this subdivision.

(c) These
 regulations do not supersede local regulations which equal or exceed minimum regulations adopted by the state.

(d) The board may enter into contracts with technical experts to meet the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 9.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4290.1.

(a) On or before July 1, 2022, the board shall develop criteria for and maintain a “Fire Risk Reduction Community” list of local agencies located in a state responsibility area or a very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, that meet best practices for local fire planning.

(b) The board shall consider all of the following when developing the criteria for the list required under subdivision (a):

(1) Compliance with the board’s regulations, including minimum fire safety standards.

(2) Participation in the
 National Fire Protection Association’s “Firewise USA” or the National Wildfire Coordinating Group’s “Fire Adapted Communities” programs.

(3) Adoption of the board’s recommendations to improve the safety element pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 65302.5 of the Government Code.

(4) Recently developed or updated community wildfire protection plans.

(c) The board shall post the “Fire Risk Reduction Community” list on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 399, Sec. 3.   (AB 1823)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4290.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2021, and every five years thereafter, the board, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, shall survey local governments, including counties, cities, and fire districts, to identify existing subdivisions located in a state responsibility area or a very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, without a secondary egress route that are at significant fire risk.

(b) (1) The board, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal and the local government that identified the subdivision, shall develop recommendations to improve the subdivision’s fire safety. The recommendations may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Creating secondary access to the subdivision.

(B) Improvements to the existing access road.

(C) Other additional fire safety measures.

(2) The board shall provide the final recommendations developed pursuant to this subdivision to the local government that identified the subdivision and to the residents of the subdivision.

(c) The board may enter into contracts with an independent group to conduct the survey required in subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this section, “subdivision” means an existing residential development of more than 30 dwelling units.

(e) The
 board shall maintain a list of the subdivisions identified in subdivision (a) and the status of the implementation of the recommendations provided pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 217.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Mountainous, Forest-, Brush- and Grass-Covered Lands [4291. - 4299.]

4291.

(a) A person who owns, leases, controls, operates, or maintains a building or structure in the state responsibility area shall at all times do all of the following:

(1) (A) Maintain defensible space of 100 feet from each side and from the front and rear of the structure, but not beyond the property line, except as provided in subparagraph (B). The amount of fuel modification necessary shall consider the flammability of the structure as affected by building material, building standards, location, and type of vegetation. Fuels shall be maintained and spaced in a condition so that a wildfire would be unlikely to ignite the structure. This subparagraph does not apply to single specimens of trees or other vegetation that are well-pruned and
 maintained so as to effectively manage fuels and not form a means of rapidly transmitting fire from other nearby vegetation to a structure or from a structure to other nearby vegetation or to interrupt the advance of embers toward a structure. The intensity of fuels management may vary within the 100-foot perimeter of the structure, with more intense fuel reductions being utilized between 5 and 30 feet around the structure, and an ember-resistant zone being required within 5 feet of the structure, based on regulations promulgated by the board, in consultation with the department, to consider the elimination of materials in the ember-resistant zone that would likely be ignited by embers. The regulations may also alter the fuel reduction required between 5 and 30 feet to integrate the ember-resistant zone into the requirements of this section. Consistent with fuels management objectives, steps should be taken to minimize erosion, soil disturbance, and the spread of flammable nonnative grasses and weeds. For
 purposes of this subparagraph, “fuel” means any combustible material, including petroleum-based products, cultivated landscape plants, grasses, and weeds, and wildland vegetation.

(B) A greater distance than that required under subparagraph (A) may be required by state law, local ordinance, rule, or regulation. Fuel modification beyond the property line may only be required by state law, local ordinance, rule, or regulation in order to maintain 100 feet of defensible space from a structure. Fuel modification on adjacent property shall only be conducted following written consent by the adjacent landowner. Any local ordinance related to fuel modification shall be in compliance with all applicable state laws, regulations, and policies. Any local ordinance may include provisions to allocate costs for any fuel modification beyond the property line.

(C) An insurance company that insures
 an occupied dwelling or occupied structure may require a greater distance than that required under subparagraph (A) if a fire expert, designated by the director, provides findings that the fuel modification is necessary to significantly reduce the risk of transmission of flame or heat sufficient to ignite the structure, and there is no other feasible mitigation measure possible to reduce the risk of ignition or spread of wildfire to the structure. The greater distance may not be beyond the property line unless allowed by state law, local ordinance, rule, or regulation.

(2) Remove that portion of a tree that extends within 10 feet of the outlet of a chimney or stovepipe.

(3) Maintain a tree, shrub, or other plant adjacent to or overhanging a building free of dead or dying wood.

(4) Maintain the roof of a structure
 free of leaves, needles, or other vegetative materials.

(5) Before constructing a new building or structure or rebuilding a building or structure damaged by a fire in an area subject to this section, the construction or rebuilding of which requires a building permit, the owner shall obtain a certification from the local building official that the dwelling or structure, as proposed to be built, complies with all applicable state and local building standards, including those described in subdivision (b) of Section 51189 of the Government Code, and shall provide a copy of the certification, upon request, to the insurer providing course of construction insurance coverage for the building or structure. Upon completion of the construction or rebuilding, the owner shall obtain from the local building official a copy of the final inspection report that demonstrates that the dwelling or structure was constructed in compliance with all applicable state
 and local building standards, including those described in subdivision (b) of Section 51189 of the Government Code, and shall provide a copy of the report, upon request, to the property insurance carrier that insures the dwelling or structure.

(b) A person is not required under this section to manage fuels on land if that person does not have the legal right to manage fuels, nor is a person required to enter upon or to alter property that is owned by any other person without the consent of the owner of the property.

(c) (1) Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Fire Marshal may adopt regulations exempting a structure with an exterior constructed entirely of nonflammable materials, or, conditioned upon the contents and composition of the structure, the director may vary the requirements respecting the removing or clearing
 away of flammable vegetation or other combustible growth with respect to the area surrounding those structures.

(2) An exemption or variance under paragraph (1) shall not apply unless and until the occupant of the structure, or if there is not an occupant, the owner of the structure, files with the State Fire Marshal, in a form as the State Fire Marshal shall prescribe, a written consent to the inspection of the interior and contents of the structure to ascertain whether this section and the regulations adopted under this section are complied with at all times.

(d) The State Fire Marshal may authorize the removal of vegetation that is not consistent with the standards of this section. The State Fire Marshal may prescribe a procedure for the removal of that vegetation and make the expense a lien upon the building, structure, or grounds, in the same manner that is applicable to a
 legislative body under Section 51186 of the Government Code.

(e) (1) The board, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, shall develop, periodically update, and post on its internet website a guidance document on fuels management pursuant to this chapter. The guidance document shall include, but not be limited to, regionally appropriate vegetation management suggestions that preserve and restore native species that are fire resistant or drought tolerant, or both, minimize erosion, minimize water consumption, and permit trees near homes for shade, aesthetics, and habitat; and suggestions to minimize or eliminate the risk of flammability of nonvegetative sources of combustion, such as woodpiles, propane tanks, decks, outdoor furniture, barbecue equipment, and outdoor fire pits.

(2) No later than one year after the board adopts regulations in compliance with
 the deadline in Executive Order No. N-18-25, the board shall, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, update the guidance document to reflect the new regulations. Existing and new structures shall meet the same standard for the ember-resistant zone, but regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall allow the staging of work for existing structures to support implementation of the ember-resistant zone and address the costs of compliance.

(f) The State Fire Marshal shall do both of the following:

(1) Recommend to the board the types of vegetation or fuel that are to be excluded from an ember-resistant zone based on the probability that vegetation and fuel will lead to ignition by ember of a structure as a part of the update to the guidance document pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(2) Make reasonable efforts to provide notice to affected residents describing the requirements added by the amendments to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) made in Assembly Bill 3074 of the 2019–20 Regular Session before the imposition of penalties for violating those requirements.

(g) (1) The requirement for an ember-resistant zone pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not take effect for new structures until the board updates the regulations, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and the guidance document, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(2) The requirement for an ember-resistant zone pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall take effect for existing structures three years after the effective date for the new structures.

(h) The
 department shall not change defensible space inspection practices and forms or enforcement to implement the requirement for an ember-resistant zone until the State Fire Marshal makes a written finding, which the State Fire Marshal shall post on the department’s internet website, that the Legislature has appropriated sufficient resources to do so.

(i) For purposes of this section, a structure for the purpose of an ember-resistant zone shall include any attached deck. This section does not limit the authority of the board or the department to require the removal of fuel or vegetation on top of or underneath a deck pursuant to this section.

(j) As used in this section, “person” means a private individual, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 731, Sec. 3.   (AB 1455)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4291.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4021, a violation of Section 4291 is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). If a person is convicted of a second violation of Section 4291 within five years, that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). If a person is convicted of a third violation of Section 4291 within five years, that person is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500). If a person is convicted of a third violation of Section 4291 within five years, the department may perform or contract for the performance of work necessary to comply with Section 4291 and may bill the person convicted for the costs incurred, in which case the person convicted, upon payment of those costs, shall not be required to pay the fine. If a person convicted of a violation of Section 4291 is granted probation, the court shall impose as a term or condition of probation, in addition to any other term or condition of probation, that the person pay at least the minimum fine prescribed in this section.

(b) If a person convicted of a violation of Section 4291 produces in court verification prior to imposition of a fine by the court, that the condition resulting in the citation no longer exists, the court may reduce the fine imposed for the violation of Section 4291 to fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4291.3.

(a) Subject to any other applicable law, a state or local fire official, at their discretion, may authorize an owner of property, or the owner’s agent, to construct a firebreak, or implement appropriate vegetation management techniques, to ensure that defensible space is adequate for the protection of a hospital, adult residential care facility, school, aboveground storage tank, hazardous materials facility, or similar facility on the property. The firebreak may be for a radius of up to 300 feet from the facility, or to the property line, whichever distance is shorter.

(b) The director may authorize an owner of a property not listed in subdivision (a) to construct a firebreak, or
 implement appropriate vegetation management techniques, within a radius of up to 300 feet from a structure, or to the property line, whichever distance is shorter, if it is determined by the director as necessary to protect life, property, and natural resources from unreasonable risks associated with wildland fires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 68.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4291.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Home hardening” means the replacement or repair of structural features that are affixed to the property with features that are in compliance with Chapter 7A (commencing with Section 701A.1) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Property owner” means a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 4291 of this code or subdivision (a) of Section 51182 of the Government Code.

(3) “Qualified entities” means the following entities that have completed the program developed, and
 received a certification, pursuant to Section 4291.6:

(A) Counties, state conservancies, special districts, and other political subdivisions of the state.

(B) Members of the California Conservation Corps, the Board of Commissioners under CaliforniaVolunteers described in Section 8411 of the Government Code, local conservation corps, resource conservation districts, fire safe councils, Firewise USA
 organizations, and nonprofit entities focused on wildfire resiliency.

(C) University of California fire advisors.

(D) Registered Professional Foresters.

(E) Other entities or individuals deemed appropriate by the director.

(4) “Wildfire safety improvements” means wildfire resilience and fire safety improvements, including measures for home hardening, the creation of defensible space, and other appropriate fuel reduction activities, to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property identified by the State Fire Marshal, in consultation with the director.

(b) The director shall establish a statewide program to allow qualified entities to support and augment the department in its defensible space and home hardening assessment and education efforts. Qualified entities participating in the program shall be authorized by the director to conduct defensible space assessments to assess compliance with Section 4291 within the state responsibility area, to assess compliance with Section 51182 of the Government Code within local responsibility areas, educate property owners about wildfire safety improvements that may be undertaken to harden a structure and make it more resistant to fire, and assess whether wildfire safety improvements have been completed in or on a structure.

(c) (1) The director shall establish a common reporting platform that allows defensible space and
 home hardening assessment data, collected by the qualified entities, to be reported to the department and shall establish any necessary quality control measure to ensure that the assessment data is accurate and reliable. Data obtained voluntarily from a property owner for reasons other than responding to a request related to compliance with Section 4291
 of this code or Section 51182 of the Government Code shall be anonymized and kept confidential if requested by the property owner, and shall not be used for compliance or enforcement purposes associated with ordinances that directly relate to defensible space and home hardening inspections unless specifically requested by the property owner.

(2) The department shall compile the data submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) The director may use the defensible space and home hardening assessment data that is gathered in response to requests related to compliance with Section 4291 of this code or Section 51182 of the Government Code, and other data voluntarily provided by a property owner if authorized by the property owner, to do any of the following:

(1) Direct inspection and enforcement resources away from landowners who meet or exceed the department’s standards and regulations for maintaining defensible space.

(2) Direct inspection and enforcement resources toward landowners who do not meet the department’s standards and regulations for maintaining defensible space.

(3) Direct educational resources toward landowners who own or maintain structures that can be hardened to make them more resistant to fire.

(4) Assist in estimating defensible space compliance in the state responsibility area.

(e) The department may expand or amend existing programs
 for the implementation of this section.

(f) This section does not grant any right of entry onto private land or regulatory or enforcement authority to participating qualified entities.

(g) Any local governmental entity that is qualified to conduct defensible space assessments pursuant to this section in very high and high fire hazard severity zones, as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of this chapter or by a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code, and reports that information to the department, shall report that information using the common reporting platform established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(h) (1) On December 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall report to the Legislature all defensible space data collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The report may include information on the proportion of unique parcels that were inspected, the degree of compliance with requirements set forth in Section 4291 of this code and Section 51182 of the Government Code, any enforcement actions that may have been taken for noncompliant parcels, and the proportion of parcels that were found to be in compliance across jurisdictions. At minimum, the report shall include data with sufficient detail to facilitate comparisons of community compliance with the requirements of Section 4291 of this code and Section 51182 of the Government Code between local
 governmental entities qualified to conduct defensible space assessments pursuant to this section and local governmental entities that are not.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 767, Sec. 2.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4291.6.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the use of trained volunteers to assist homeowners and fire agencies in achieving compliance with defensible space requirements will provide multiple benefits, including all of the following:

(A) Creating a significant public benefit by reducing the risk of the spread of wildfire.

(B) Creating significant savings for fire agencies by increasing general compliance with defensible space requirements, and thereby reducing the volume of inspections required by public agencies.

(C) Allowing fire
 agencies to focus their defensible space regulatory enforcement on landowners who are not in compliance after suggestions for voluntary compliance from trained volunteers.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the department do both of the following:

(A) Establish a pilot program using trained volunteers with any costs for the pilot project coming from the existing funds made available to the department from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code.

(B) Consider using the services of the California Fire Science Consortium and the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity program at the Natural Resources Agency to implement this section.

(b) The department shall develop and implement a training program to train individuals to support and augment the department
 in its defensible space and home hardening assessment and public education efforts. The training program shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide for consistent training for third-party assessors who shall function to provide nonregulatory assistance to homeowners to reduce fire risk and to achieve compliance with defensible space requirements.

(2) Ensure that all defensible space and home hardening assessment and education programs undertaken by the department and by third parties are conducted to the same standard and use coordinated messaging, including messages at www.readyforwildfire.org or a successor internet website, as updated by the department.

(c) Upon an individual’s successful
 completion of the training program, the department shall issue a certification of completion to the individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4292.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 4296, any person that owns, controls, operates, or maintains any electrical transmission or distribution line upon any mountainous land, or forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land shall, during such times and in such areas as are determined to be necessary by the director or the agency which has primary responsibility for fire protection of such areas, maintain around and adjacent to any pole or tower which supports a switch, fuse, transformer, lightning arrester, line junction, or dead end or corner pole, a firebreak which consists of a clearing of not less than 10 feet in each direction from the outer circumference of such pole or tower. This section does not, however, apply to any line which is used exclusively as telephone, telegraph, telephone or telegraph messenger call, fire or alarm line, or other line which is classed as a communication circuit by the Public Utilities Commission. The director or the agency which has primary fire protection responsibility for the protection of such areas may permit exceptions from the requirements of this section which are based upon the specific circumstances involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4293.
